Alabama, session 2026rs, SB326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) ALEA. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency.
(2) ANCHORING. The temporary securing of a vessel to
the bed of a water body solely by resistance of an anchor that
is dropped from the vessel which is carried aboard the vessel
while underway.
(3) EMERGENCY SITUATION. Any situation requiring a
vessel to remain anchored to avoid imminent danger to life or
property due to mechanical failure of the vessel, severe
weather, or other hazard.
(4) RAFTING. A group of two or more vessels that are
stationary upon a water body and are congregated together,
whether anchored, secured to one another, or adrift.
(5) VESSEL. Every description of watercraft, barge, or
other artificial contrivance capable of being used as a means
of transportation on the water.
(b) ALEA, in consultation with the Alabama Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources, Tennessee Valley
Authority, United States Army Corps of Engineers, United
States Coast Guard, and any other entity with regulatory
authority over a major body of water within the state, shall
adopt rules that:
(1) Prevent and establish a legal mechanism for the
removal of vessels that are long-term, unlawfully, or unsafely
anchoring, including vessels occupied by individuals whose
Page 2

anchoring, including vessels occupied by individuals whose
SB326 INTRODUCED
activities create safety, environmental, or nuisance concerns
for other individuals on the water or adjacent landowners; and
(2) Provide restrictions, including minimum distances,
for anchoring and rafting of vessels. These rules may include
restrictions specific to certain locations, including public
access areas, shorelines adjacent to private residences,
marinas, parks, commercial waterfronts, and other locations
where vessel placement may interfere with navigation, public
safety, property rights, or environmental protections.
(c) ALEA may adopt necessary procedures to enforce any
rule adopted pursuant to subsection (b), including citations
for violating a rule, procedures for impounding, towing,
storing, and disposing of vessels violating a rule, and fees,
including for towing, storing, and disposing of violating
vessels.
(d) A violation of any rule adopted pursuant to this
section is punishable as a boating violation under Section
33-5-35, Code of Alabama 1975.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit
or supersede any federal authority, to the limit that it
exists, over waters in this state.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3